Maine, session 132, LD1105.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §1407 is enacted to read:
§1407. Displaced civilian federal firefighters database
The department shall establish and maintain a database of the names of civilian federal
firefighters who have been displaced by a layoff or reduction in force at or closure of a
federal installation in this State, including, but not limited to, a naval shipyard, a military
base or a facility of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, pursuant to this
section.
1. Application. A civilian federal firefighter may apply for inclusion in the database
by providing a copy of the notice that the firefighter's position has been terminated due to
a reduction in force at or closure of a federal installation in this State.
2. Distribution. The department shall distribute or make available from the database
a list of displaced civilian federal firefighters to municipalities that maintain a municipal
fire department pursuant to Title 30-A, chapter 153.
3. Term. The name of a displaced civilian federal firefighter in the database must be
maintained for no less than 4 years unless the department is notified that the firefighter has
requested to be removed from the database.
4. Consultation. The department may consult with organizations that represent the
interests of civilian federal firefighters when establishing the database.
Page 1 - 132LR0116(03)